Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Chapter 1. State Highway Law; General Transportation Provisions
§ 11.
Transportation Fund.

The Transportation Fund shall comprise the following:

all taxes, penalties, and fees received by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles except those relating to motorboats imposed under 23 V.S.A. chapter 29, which shall be expended pursuant to

23 V.S.A. § 3319

;

the revenue derived from the taxes on motor fuel as provided for by Title 23;

all grants from the federal government and regional associations for transportation purposes except for snowmobiles and motorboats;

monies received from the sales and use tax on aviation jet fuel and on natural gas used to propel a motor vehicle under 32 V.S.A. chapter 233, and from the portion of a local option tax on the sale of aviation jet fuel specified in

24 V.S.A. § 138

;

receipts from pilot and aircraft license fees;

all penalties and fines imposed under this title and Titles 5 and 23;

both statewide and departmental indirect cost recoveries from federal sources by the Agency of Transportation;

other miscellaneous sources including the sale of maps, plans, and reports, fees collected by the Travel Information Council, leases for property at State-owned airports and railroads, proceeds from the sale of State surplus property under the provisions of

29 V.S.A. §§ 1556

and 1557, and proceeds from the sale of recycled materials.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 51

, § 1a;

1993, No. 27

, § 1;

1999, No. 62

, § 260, eff. June 2, 1999;

2009, No. 50

, § 66;

2011, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 43, eff. July 1, 2013;

2017, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2019.

§ 11a.
Transportation funds appropriated for the Department of Public Safety.

No transportation funds shall be appropriated for the support of government other than for the Agency, the Board, Transportation Pay Act Funds, construction of transportation capital facilities, transportation debt service, the operation of information centers by the Department of Buildings and General Services, and the Department of Public Safety. The amount of transportation funds appropriated to the Department of Public Safety shall not exceed:

$25,250,000.00 in fiscal year 2014;

$22,750,000.00 in fiscal years 2015 and 2016;

$21,150,000.00 in fiscal year 2017; and

$20,250,000.00 in fiscal year 2018 and in succeeding fiscal years.

In fiscal year 2017, of the funds appropriated to the Department of Public Safety pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the amount of $1,680,000.00 is allocated exclusively for the purchase, outfitting, assignment, and disposal of State Police vehicles. In fiscal year 2018 and in succeeding fiscal years, of the funds appropriated to the Department of Public Safety pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the amount of $2,100,000.00 is allocated exclusively for the purchase, outfitting, assignment, and disposal of State Police vehicles. Any unexpended and unencumbered funds remaining in this allocation at the close of a fiscal year shall revert to the Transportation Fund. The Department of Public Safety may periodically recommend to the General Assembly that this allocation be adjusted to reflect market conditions for the vehicles and equipment.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 42; amended

2003, No. 56

, § 30, eff. June 4, 2003;

2003, No. 68

, § 38, eff. July 1, 2004;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. June 9, 2004;

2005, No. 80

, § 43;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 51;

2007, No. 65

, § 271;

2007, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.001;

2009, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § E.900;

2011, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § E.922;

2013, No. 12

, § 27;

2015, No. 58

, § E.900;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2017, No. 3

, § 73, eff. March 2, 2017.

§ 11b.
Town Highway Revolving Fund.

There is created a special account within the Transportation Fund known as the Town Highway Revolving Fund for the purpose of charging the expense for work performed for towns by the Agency. All receipts from towns for performance of these services shall be credited to this account. The Commissioner of Finance and Management may incur overdrafts, not to exceed $250,000.00 in total, in this account in anticipation of amounts due from towns. However, the Commissioner may waive the limitation on overdrafts to the extent that a town’s reimbursement to the State is contingent on the town’s receipt of emergency relief funds from federal sources.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 35

, § 6, eff. May 18, 1991;

1991, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 21, 1992;

1999, No. 18

, § 17, eff. May 13, 1999.

§ 11c.
Deposit in escrow account of amounts retained from progress payments.

Upon satisfactory completion of the contract work and full settlement or payment of all damages, claims, or liabilities incurred in connection with the contract work, the retained percentage and any interest accrued, shall be paid to the contractor or consultant. If the escrow conditions are not fulfilled, then the Agency shall be paid the retained percentage and any interest accrued or such amount necessary to settle or pay the damages, claims, or liabilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 27

, § 2.

§ 11d.
Funds for rehabilitation of historic bridges.

Notwithstanding

32 V.S.A. § 706(1)

and (2), the Agency of Transportation may transfer funds to the Division for Historic Preservation in the Agency of Commerce and Community Development to be used for the following purposes:

Repairing, rehabilitating, restoring, and maintaining historic bridges. To the maximum extent feasible, bridges shall be made available to the public for transportation and recreational uses, including bicycle paths, hiking trails, snowmobile trails, fishing access, picnic areas, or rest stops.

Grants to municipalities, nonprofit corporations, State agencies, or other responsible parties for the repair and maintenance of historic bridges.

Funding for planning and engineering studies for the preservation of historic bridges.

Moving, storing, or otherwise preserving historic bridges.

Funds transferred may include appropriations from the Transportation Fund, federal funds made available to mitigate the adverse effects of new construction on historic bridges, and monies from other public or private sources.

Transfer of funds under this section shall constitute acceptance by the Division for Historic Preservation that funds transferred will be used solely for the preservation of historic bridges as outlined in subsection (a) of this section. Transfers, however, may be conditioned upon use for one or more specific purposes identified by subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 36

, § 2; amended

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a);

2021, No. 20

, § 81.

§ 11e.
Reimbursements.

Receipts for damage to State property under the control of the Agency of Transportation, other than recoveries under

32 V.S.A. § 134

, sales of supplies, interdepartmental transfers for maintenance of roads under the jurisdiction of other departments of the State, receipts from the Efficiency Vermont Program, and receipts from municipalities and public utilities cooperating with the Agency of Transportation for highway or grade crossing work shall be credited to the same account from which the expenditures have been or will be incurred.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 235; amended

2003, No. 56

, § 60, eff. June 4, 2003.

§ 11f.
Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund.

There is created a special fund within the Transportation Fund known as the Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund to consist of funds raised from the motor fuel transportation infrastructure assessments levied pursuant to

23 V.S.A. §§ 3003(a)

and 3106(a). Interest from the Fund shall be credited to the Fund, and the amount in the Fund shall carry forward from year to year.

As used in this section, the terms “Transportation Infrastructure Bonds Debt Service Fund” and “debt service obligations” are as defined in

32 V.S.A. § 951a

.

Monies in the Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund shall be transferred to the Transportation Infrastructure Bonds Debt Service Fund to cover all debt service obligations of transportation infrastructure bonds that are due in the current fiscal year and as otherwise required in accordance with any trust agreement pertaining to such bonds.

Provided that resources in the Transportation Infrastructure Bonds Debt Service Fund are sufficient in amount to cover all debt service obligations of transportation infrastructure bonds that are due in the current fiscal year and to meet all other obligations set forth in any trust agreement pertaining to any such bonds, any remaining balance in the Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund may be used to pay for:

the rehabilitation, reconstruction, or replacement of State bridges, culverts, roads, railroads, airports, and necessary buildings that, after such work, have an estimated minimum remaining useful life of 10 years;

the rehabilitation, reconstruction, or replacement of municipal bridges, culverts, and highways that, after such work, have an estimated minimum remaining useful life of 10 years; and

up to $100,000.00 per year for operating costs associated with administering the capital expenditures.

To the extent in the current fiscal year any balance remains in the Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund after all transfers required by subsection (c) of this section have been made and all appropriations authorized by subsection (d) of this section are accounted for, such remaining balance may be transferred to the Transportation Infrastructure Bonds Debt Service Fund to cover debt service obligations of transportation infrastructure bonds that are due in future fiscal years.

The assessments for motor fuel transportation infrastructure assessments paid pursuant to

23 V.S.A. §§ 3003(a)

and 3106(a) shall not be reduced below the rates in effect at the time of issuance of any transportation infrastructure bond until the principal, interest, and all costs that must be paid in order to retire the bond have been paid.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, all transfers of funds from the Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund to the Transportation Infrastructure Bonds Debt Service Fund shall be approved by the General Assembly.

To minimize disruption of summer construction schedules, it is the policy of the State to have a balance in the Transportation Infrastructure Bonds Debt Service Fund at the end of each fiscal year that is sufficient in amount to cover all debt service obligations of transportation infrastructure bonds that are due or are anticipated to be due in the succeeding fiscal year. To achieve the policy objective of ensuring the State’s transportation infrastructure bond obligations are fulfilled with a minimum of disruption to the construction schedules of approved projects, in the event that revenue, economic, or other conditions vary from those assumed in the consensus forecast and in the budget process in which the General Assembly approved transfers to the Transportation Infrastructure Bonds Debt Service Fund, the Secretary of Transportation with the approval of the Secretary of Administration may, notwithstanding the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 706

:

transfer appropriations of transportation infrastructure bond funds to the Transportation Infrastructure Bonds Debt Service Fund; and

transfer appropriations of transportation funds to replace transportation infrastructure bond funds transferred under subdivision (1) of this subsection, provided no significant delay in the construction schedule of any approved project results from the transfer.

After executing a transfer authorized by subsection (h) of this section, the administration shall give prompt notice thereof to the Joint Fiscal Office and submit an explanation and description of the action taken to the Joint Fiscal Committee at its next scheduled meeting.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 50

, § 27; amended

2011, No. 63

, § F.100, eff. June 2, 2011.

§ 12.
Appropriations to Agency of Transportation.

Monies appropriated from the Transportation Fund to the Agency shall be appropriated to the Agency accounts for the following purposes:

construction and maintenance of State highways, railroads, and airports, including necessary buildings and equipment;

aid to municipalities for the support of class 1, 2, or 3 town highways and bridges;

general administration of the Agency, including a grant for pensions;

debt service for principal and interest of highway bonds;

operation of public transit systems, railroads, and airports, including administration of appropriate sections of Title 5; and

operation of the Department of Motor Vehicles, including administration of Title 23.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 12a.
Transportation Program provided to the Committees on Transportation.

The Transportation Program shall be provided by the Agency of Transportation to the members of the House and Senate Committees on Transportation following the presentation of the State budget to the General Assembly by the Governor as required by

32 V.S.A. § 306

.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 121

, § 20c; amended

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 39;

2001, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. June 21, 2002;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 33, 50, eff. June 9, 2004.

§ 12b.
Joint Transportation Oversight Committee.

There is created a Joint Transportation Oversight Committee composed of the Chairs of the House and Senate Committees on Appropriations, the House and Senate Committees on Transportation, the House Committee on Ways and Means, and the Senate Committee on Finance. The Committee shall be chaired alternately by the Chairs of the House and Senate Committees on Transportation, and the two-year term shall run concurrently with the biennial session of the General Assembly. The Chair of the Senate Committee on Transportation shall chair the Committee during the 2009-2010 legislative session.

The Committee shall meet during adjournment for official duties. Meetings shall be convened by the Chair and, when practicable, shall be coordinated with the regular meetings of the Joint Fiscal Committee. Members shall be entitled to compensation and reimbursement pursuant to

2 V.S.A. § 23

. The Committee shall have the assistance of the staff of the Office of Legislative Counsel, the Office of Legislative Operations, and the Joint Fiscal Office.

The Committee shall provide legislative oversight of the Transportation Fund revenues collection and the operation and administration of the Agency of Transportation construction, paving, and rehabilitation programs. The Secretary of Transportation shall report to the Committee upon request.

If and when applicable, the Secretary shall submit electronically to the Joint Fiscal Office for distribution to members of the Committee a report summarizing any plans or actions taken to delay project schedules as a result of:

a generalized increase in bids relative to project estimates;

changes in the consensus revenue forecast of the Transportation Fund or Transportation Infrastructure Bond Fund; or

changes in the availability of federal funds.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 25

, § 78, eff. May 18, 1993; amended

1993, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. June 17, 1994;

2005, No. 80

, §§ 44, 45;

2009, No. 50

, § 87;

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2011, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 30;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2021, No. 20

, § 82.

§ 12c.
Repealed. 2009, No. 123 (Adj. Sess.), § 55.

§ 13.
Central Garage Fund.

There is created the Central Garage Fund, which shall be used:

to furnish equipment on a rental basis to the districts and other sections of the Agency for construction, maintenance, and operation of highways or other transportation activities; and

to provide a general equipment repair and major overhaul service as well as to furnish necessary supplies for the operation of the equipment.

To maintain a safe, reliable equipment fleet, new or replacement highway maintenance equipment shall be acquired using Central Garage Fund monies. The Agency is authorized to acquire replacement pieces for existing highway equipment or new, additional equipment equivalent to equipment already owned; however, the Agency shall not increase the total number of permanently assigned or authorized motorized or self-propelled vehicles without approval by the General Assembly.

For the purpose specified in subsection (b) of this section, the following amount shall be transferred from the Transportation Fund to the Central Garage Fund:
(c) (1) For the purpose specified in subsection (b) of this section, the following amount shall be transferred from the Transportation Fund to the Central Garage Fund:

in fiscal year 2021, $1,355,358.00; and

in subsequent fiscal years, at a minimum, the amount specified in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1) as adjusted annually by increasing the previous fiscal year’s amount by the percentage increase in the Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) during the two most recently closed State fiscal years.

Each fiscal year, the sum of the following shall be appropriated from the Central Garage Fund exclusively for the purpose specified in subsection (b) of this section:

the amount transferred pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection;

the amount of the equipment depreciation expense from the prior fiscal year; and

the amount of the net equipment sales from the prior fiscal year.

In each fiscal year, net income of the Fund earned during that fiscal year shall be retained in the Fund.

For the purposes of computing net worth and net income, the fiscal year shall be the year ending June 30.

As used in this section, “equipment” means registered motor vehicles and highway maintenance equipment assigned to the Central Garage.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1995, No. 60

, § 21, eff. April 25, 1995;

1999, No. 18

, § 5, eff. May 13, 1999;

1999, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 36, eff. May 29, 2000;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 50, eff. June 9, 2004;

2005, No. 80

, §§ 40, 46;

2007, No. 75

, § 23;

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

2017, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2019, No. 59

, § 16.

§ 14.
State highways.

The State highways shall be those highways so designated on a map entitled “Vermont State Highways,” filed in the Office of the Secretary of State on June 30, 1997, as subsequently modified by additions or deletions made pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

When an addition or deletion is made to the State highways, the Agency shall complete a mileage certificate showing the highways that are added or deleted and file a copy in the Office of the Secretary of State. It shall also file a copy of the mileage certificate in the town clerk’s office where the highways are located. When the certificates are filed, the transfer of control of the highways shall be deemed to have taken place.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 15.
Changes in the State highway system.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, highways may be added to or deleted from the State highway system by:

an act of the General Assembly; or

a proposal by the Agency that is accepted by the legislative body of the affected municipality and approved by an act of the General Assembly.

Upon entering into an agreement with the affected municipality, the Secretary may relinquish to municipal control segments of State highway rights-of-way that have been replaced by new construction and are no longer needed as part of the State highway system. Upon their relinquishment to municipal control, the segments shall become class 3 town highways, and may be reclassified by the municipality in accordance with chapter 7 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2013, No. 12

, § 15.

§ 15a.
Border crossings; cooperation with federal government.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title but pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, the Agency (in the case of State highways) and municipalities (in the case of town highways) are authorized to cooperate with federal projects to modernize border crossings between the United States and Canada by relinquishing to the federal government those portions of State or town highways approaching the border that may be required by the federal government for its border crossing projects.

In connection with the relinquishments authorized in subsection (a) of this section, the Agency and municipalities are authorized to execute agreements with the federal government, including a conveyance of an interest in real property, easements, leases, and other instruments necessary to ensure that federal requirements are met. The federal government shall be responsible for maintenance of those State and town highways relinquished under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 56

, § 51, eff. June 4, 2003; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 83.

§ 16.
Duties of Secretary in unorganized towns and gores.

The Secretary shall have the same power in all matters pertaining to the highways in unorganized towns and gores that selectboards have in organized towns, and may spend any available funds, including State aid and local taxes, to assist unorganized towns and gores for this purpose. After exhausting the right of administrative appeal to the Board under subdivision 5(d)(3) of this title, landowners shall have the same right to appeal from the decision of the Board in the exercise of this power as in like proceedings by selectboards in organized towns.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 17.
Contracts; labor preference.

A person, firm, or corporation awarded any contract for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, and repair of a highway under the jurisdiction of the Agency shall give preference to Vermont labor and to trucks owned in Vermont and operated by residents of Vermont on all contracts of construction, reconstruction, improvement, and repair, provided this action is not contrary to federal rules and regulations.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 18.
Wages.

In making up specifications and advertising for bids on highway work, the Agency shall fix, subject to local conditions, the minimum wage per hour for various classes of labor and the minimum to be paid per hour or per cubic yard for trucks that the contractor shall be bound to pay.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2019, No. 59

, § 25.

§ 19.
Small business enterprises.

It is declared to be in the best interests of the State and the general welfare of Vermonters to encourage and develop the actual and potential capacity of small business enterprises, and to use this important segment of the State’s economy to the fullest practicable extent in the construction of State highways, including federal aid and interstate highway systems. In order to carry out this intent and encourage full and free competition, the Agency of Transportation shall cooperate with small business enterprises in connection with the State highway construction program. Nothing contained in this section shall be considered or construed as meaning more than a legislative declaration of intent and policy. The decisions and actions of the Agency shall not be subject to judicial challenge.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 84.

§ 20.
Small claims for injury or damage.

The Board shall have exclusive jurisdiction over claims of $5,000.00 or less made for personal injuries or property damage, or both, sustained as the result of the negligence of any employee of the Agency. The Board may hear all parties in interest and may award damages not to exceed $5,000.00. When the Board awards damages, it shall certify its decision to the Commissioner of Finance and Management. Upon the disposition of any appeal or the expiration or waiver of all appeal rights, the Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue his or her warrant for the amount of the award, with payment in the manner prescribed by

12 V.S.A. § 5604

.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2013, No. 12

, § 16.

§ 21.
Picnic areas and parking places.

The Agency may purchase, or lease, or take in the manner provided in chapter 5 of this title, as part of the highway, land adjacent to any route that is needed for the preservation of its scenic character, or for the purpose of providing picnic or camping grounds, or for parking areas for the use of travelers, provided that land taken for these purposes by condemnation proceedings shall not extend in width more than 250 feet from the center of the traveled portion of the highway (except limited access facilities).

The Agency shall, as a matter of policy, consider the establishment of wayside rest areas when constructing or reconstructing State highways, and when requested, town highways. The cost of building or rebuilding the wayside rest areas shall be included in the costs of constructing or reconstructing that highway. The cost of maintenance of these wayside rest areas shall be included in the cost of maintaining that highway.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1999, No. 18

, § 18, eff. May 13, 1999;

2007, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 33.

§ 22.
Penalties.

A person who violates a provision of subsection 21(c) of this title shall be fined not more than $100.00 for each day of violation.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 23.
Rights of action; notice.

All rights of action on account of the insufficiency or want of repair of any bridge or culvert on the highways taken over by the State shall exist against the State and not against the town, provided that the notice required in sections 987 and 988 of this title is first given in writing to the Agency, and provided further that liability shall be the same as set forth in section 985 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 24.
Venue and service.

Any action against the State shall be brought against the State, returnable to the Superior Court in the county where the damages were sustained.
Service of the writ shall be made on the Governor or Attorney General.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 25.
Settlement and payment.

After receiving the notice provided for in section 23 of this title, the Agency with the approval of the Attorney General may adjust and settle with the person claiming damages, and the Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue his or her warrant for payment.
All money spent under this section shall be drawn from the Transportation Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 26.
Purchase and sale of property.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section:
(a) (1) Subject to subsection (b) of this section:

The Agency may purchase or lease any land, taking conveyance in the name of the State, when land is needed in connection with the layout, construction, repair, and maintenance of any State highway or the reconstruction of the highway.

The Agency may acquire or construct buildings necessary for use in connection with this work.

When any of the land or the buildings acquired or the buildings constructed become no longer necessary for these purposes, the Agency may sell or lease the property.

The proceeds from any sale or lease shall be deposited in the Transportation Fund, unless otherwise required by federal law or regulation.

An acquisition or transfer or the construction under this section of property or rights in property with an appraised or other estimated value of $500,000.00 or above, or the acquisition or transfer of an option to acquire property with an appraised or other estimated value of $500,000.00 or above, shall be made with the specific prior approval of the General Assembly of the acquisition, transfer, or construction and its terms or, if the General Assembly is not in session, with the specific prior approval of the Joint Transportation Oversight Committee. The requirement of this subsection shall not apply, however, if the General Assembly has approved a specific project described in the annual Transportation Program and the scope of the project includes the acquisition or transfer of property.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2003, No. 56

, § 24, eff. June 4, 2003;

2003, No. 80

(Adj. Sess.), § 84, eff. March 8, 2004;

2011, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 47;

2013, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 26a.
Determination of rent to be charged for leasing or licensing State-owned property under the Agency’s jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of this section, or as otherwise provided by law, leases or licenses negotiated by the Agency under

5 V.S.A. §§ 204

and 3405 and section 26 and subsection 1703(d) of this title ordinarily shall require the payment of fair market value rent, as determined by the prevailing area market prices for comparable space or property. However, the Agency may lease or license State-owned property under its jurisdiction for less than fair market value when the Agency determines that the proposed occupancy or use serves a public purpose or that there exist other relevant factors, such as a prior course of dealing between the parties, that justify setting rent at less than fair market value.

Unless otherwise required by federal law, the Agency shall assess, collect, and deposit in the Transportation Fund a reasonable charge or payment with respect to leases or licenses for access to or use of State-owned rights-of-way by providers of broadband or wireless communications facilities or services. The Agency may waive such charge or payment in whole or in part if the provider offers to provide comparable value to the State so as to meet the public good as determined by the Agency and the Department of Public Service. For the purposes of this section, the term “comparable value to the State” shall be construed broadly to further the State’s interest in ubiquitous broadband and wireless service availability at reasonable cost. Any waiver of charges or payments for comparable value to the State granted by the Agency may not exceed five years. Thereafter, the Agency may extend any waiver granted for an additional period not to exceed five years if the Agency makes affirmative written findings demonstrating that the State has received and will continue to receive value that is comparable to the value to the provider of the waiver, or it may revise the terms of the waiver in order to do so.

Nothing in this section shall authorize the Agency to impose a charge or payment for the use of a highway right-of-way that is not otherwise authorized or required by State or federal law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair any contractual rights existing on June 9, 2007. The State shall have no authority under this section to waive any sums due to a railroad. The State shall also not offer any grants or waivers of charges for any new broadband installations in segments of rail corridor where an operating railroad has installed or allowed installation of fiber optic facilities prior to June 9, 2007 unless the State offers equivalent terms and conditions to the owner or owners of existing fiber optic facilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

2007, No. 79

, § 10, eff. June 9, 2007;

2013, No. 12

, § 17;

2015, No. 41

, § 14;

2021, No. 20

, § 85.

§ 27.
Throughway designation.

The Agency may designate any State highway or part of a State highway as a throughway and, after notice, may revoke the designation.
A town may designate any town highway or part of a town highway within the control of the town as a throughway and, after notice, may revoke the designation.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 28.
Regulatory signs.

Except as provided in

23 V.S.A. § 1074

, the designation of a throughway shall not become effective as to regulation of traffic at any point in intersection with any highway until the Agency or the selectboard in a town, as the case may be, shall erect suitable regulatory signs or signals in accordance with the requirements of

23 V.S.A. § 1025

. The Agency or the selectboard in a town, as the case may be, may designate any intersection under their respective jurisdictions as a “stop” intersection or a “yield right of way” intersection.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 27, 1992;

1995, No. 73

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 29.
Intersecting highways.

A highway joining a throughway at an angle, whether or not it crosses the throughway, shall be deemed to intersect it.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 30.
Issue of notes for State highway construction.

The State Treasurer, with the approval of the Governor, may borrow money upon notes of the State in anticipation of the proceeds of transportation bonds that have been or subsequently are authorized by the General Assembly or in anticipation of the proceeds of federal funds made available to Vermont for purposes of construction of transportation facilities, when the construction has been previously authorized by the General Assembly and provision made for the State’s portion of the cost. The notes shall be issued on terms and at times as the State Treasurer and Governor may determine. Not more than $5,000,000.00 principal amount of the notes shall be outstanding at any one time and each note shall mature not later than one year from its date, provided that notes issued for a shorter period may be refunded from time to time by the issue of other notes maturing within the required period. Any purchaser of notes issued under this section may rely on this section as the authorization for the notes and need not examine the availability or amount of the bond authorizations or federal funds being anticipated. This authority is in addition to and not in limitation of any other authority.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 86.

§ 31.
Abandonment of project; reconveyance.

If land has been acquired by the State in fee simple for highway purposes, or if the State has acquired a perpetual leasehold in land for highway purposes, and if the land has not been improved subsequent to its acquisition, the State shall not sell or dispose of the land within six years of the date of its acquisition unless it first offers to reconvey it to the person or persons from whom it was acquired or their heirs or assigns, for a consideration equal to the price at which it was acquired, plus interest at the rate of six percent per year from date of acquisition by the State, provided that the address of the person or persons is known to or reasonably ascertainable by the Agency.
The person or persons to whom the land is to be offered shall be given written notice of their right to repurchase the land under this section and shall be allowed 60 days to complete the purchase in the event they desire to exercise that right.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 32.
Assumed width of right-of-way.

A roadway width of one and one-half rods on each side of the center of the existing traveled way can be assumed and controlled for highway purposes whenever the original survey was not properly recorded, or the records preserved, or if the terminations and boundaries cannot be determined.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.